District of Columbia statutes.
2-1582

Strategy update.

(a)

The Mayor, within 30 days of the adoption of the budget, shall disseminate the budget and implementation strategy for the Youth Development Plan for each fiscal year (“youth development report”). Copies of the youth development report shall be transmitted to each member of the Council and posted on the District government’s website. This report shall summarize the successes and difficulties of the previous year’s strategy and any new youth development initiatives that are to be included in the plan for the upcoming year.

(b)

The youth development report shall also include qualitative and quantitative outcome measures and performance measures (“measures”) for each implemented initiative (“measures”). Outcome measures and performance measures for other initiatives shall be developed as soon as practicable. The Deputy Mayor for Children, Youth, Families and Elders and the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice shall develop these measures upon advice from the Youth Development Plan Executive Working Group established under § 2-1585.

(c)

For purposes of this section, the term “Qualitative and quantitative outcome measures and performance measures” means indicators of progress toward achieving the citywide goals established in the Children’s Budget Report and ensuring that youth development programs are provided effectively and efficiently.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 1153, 53 DCR 6899

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1153 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1153 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1153 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).